Utah statutes.
48-1d-1206.   Noncomplying name of foreign limited liability partnership.

(1)  A foreign limited liability partnership whose name does not comply with Section 48-1d-1105 may not register to do business in this state until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in this state, an alternate name that complies with Section 48-1d-1105.  A registered foreign limited liability partnership that registers under an alternate name under this Subsection (1) need not comply with Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting Business Under Assumed Name.  After registering to do business in this state with an alternate name, a registered foreign partnership shall do business in this state under:

(a)  the alternate name;

(b)  the foreign limited liability partnership's name, with the addition of its jurisdiction in which the foreign limited liability partnership's statement of qualification or equivalent filing is filed; or

(c)  an assumed or fictitious name the foreign limited liability partnership is authorized to use under Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting Business Under Assumed Name.

(2)  If a registered foreign limited liability partnership changes its name to one that does not comply with Section 48-1d-1105, it may not do business in this state until it complies with Subsection (1) by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with Section 48-1d-1105.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

